Missouri, session 2026, SB1648.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.425, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 160.425,
to read as follows:
160.425. 1. The "Missouri Charter Public School
Commission" is hereby created within the department of
elementary and secondary education with the authority to
sponsor high quality charter schools throughout the state of
Missouri.
2. The commission shall consist of nine members
appointed by the [governor, by and with the advice and
consent of the senate] state board of education. No more
than five of the members shall be of the same political
party. No more than two members shall be from the same
congressional district. The term of office of each member
shall be four years, except those of the members first
appointed, of which three shall be appointed for a term of
one year, two for a term of two years, two for a term of
three years, and two for a term of four years. At the
expiration of the term of each member, the [governor, by and
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1648 2
with the advice and consent of the senate,] state board of
education shall appoint a successor.
3. [The appointees to the commission shall be selected
as follows:
(1) One member selected by the governor from a slate
of three recommended by the commissioner of education;
(2) One member selected by the governor from a slate
of three recommended by the commissioner of higher education;
(3) One member selected by the governor from a slate
of three recommended by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(4) One member selected by the governor from a slate
of three recommended by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(5) Five additional members appointed by the governor,
one of whom shall be selected from a slate of three nominees
recommended by the Missouri School Boards Association.
4.] Members appointed to the commission shall
collectively possess strong experience and expertise in
governance, management and finance, school leadership,
assessment, curriculum and instruction, and education law.
All members of the commission shall have demonstrated
understanding of and commitment to charter schooling as a
strategy for strengthening public education.
[5.] 4. The commission shall annually elect a
chairperson and vice chairperson, who shall act as
chairperson in his or her absence. The commission shall
meet at the call of the chairperson. The chairperson may
call meetings at such times as he or she deems advisable and
shall call a meeting when requested to do so by three or
more members of the commission. Members of the commission
are not eligible to receive compensation.

SB 1648 3
[6.] 5. The commission may approve proposed charters
for its sponsorship under sections 160.400 to 160.425 and
shall:
(1) Comply with all of the requirements applicable to
sponsors under sections 160.400 to 160.425;
(2) Exercise sponsorship over charters approved by the
commission under sections 160.400 to 160.425, including
receipt of sponsorship funding under subsection 11 of
section 160.400. Sponsorship funding due to the commission
shall be deposited to the credit of the charter public
school commission revolving fund created pursuant to this
section.
[7.] 6. Charter schools sponsored by the commission
shall comply with all of the requirements applicable to
charter schools under sections 160.400 to 160.425.
[8.] 7. The commission shall conduct its business in
accordance with chapter 610.
[9.] 8. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall provide start-up funding for the commission
to operate. The commission shall reimburse the department's
costs from any funds it receives as sponsor under section
160.400.
[10.] 9. The commission is authorized to receive and
expend gifts, grants, and donations of any kind from any
public or private entity to carry out the purposes of
sections 160.400 to 160.425, subject to the terms and
conditions under which they are given, provided that all
such terms and conditions are permissible under law.
[11.] 10. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Charter Public School Commission Revolving
Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under this
section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the

SB 1648 4
fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
state treasurer may approve disbursements. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner
as other funds are invested. Subject to appropriation,
moneys in the fund shall be used solely for the
administration of this section.
✓